District of Columbia statutes.
34-1521

Consumer disclosure requirements.

(a)

An entity selling or reselling an interest in a community renewable energy facility shall provide a disclosure to the potential subscriber that includes the following, prior to the sale or resale of that subscription:

(1)

A good faith estimate of the annual kilowatt hours to be delivered by the community renewable energy facility based on the size of the subscriber’s interest;

(2)

A plain language explanation of the terms under which the bill credits will be calculated;

(3)

A plain language explanation of the contract provisions regulating the disposition or transfer of the subscription; and

(4)

A plain language explanation of the costs and benefits to the potential subscriber based on the subscriber’s current usage and applicable tariff, for the term of the proposed contract.

(b)

The Mayor or his or her designee may require that any entity engaged in the sale or resale of a subscription in a community renewable energy facility provide additional disclosure to the buyer or lessee, the Mayor, or both.

(c)

All contracts for the sale or resale of a subscription in a community renewable energy facility for use in a residential dwelling may be reviewed by the Mayor or his or her designee upon request.

(d)

The Mayor pursuant to subchapter 1 of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to carry out the disclosure requirements contained in this section.

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 121
as added Dec. 13, 2013, D.C. Law 20-47, § 2(e), 60 DCR 15138
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-47 added this section.